








Jules A. Musing - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Jules A. Musing
Former Board Member at TherapeuticsMD, Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Jules A. Musing? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jules A. Musing's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jules A. Musing's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jules A. Musing's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jules A. Musing through your network of contacts.
												








Jules A. Musing's Executive Work History


Past
To view Jules A. Musing's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
69

 
 


Jules A. Musing's Biography



Jules A. Musing has served as a director of our company since May 2013. In the course of Mr. Musing's 36-year career in the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry, specifically at Johnson & Johnson and its affiliates, he has been responsible for the worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products and technologies and the establishment of strategic alliances. This included the establishment of new scientific, technology and product collaborations in various therapeutic areas, the negotiation of licensing and alliance agreements with biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies worldwide, and the partnering, sp ...
(Read More)

			Jules A. Musing has served as a director of our company since May 2013. In the course of Mr. Musing's 36-year career in the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry, specifically at Johnson & Johnson and its affiliates, he has been responsible for the worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products and technologies and the establishment of strategic alliances. This included the establishment of new scientific, technology and product collaborations in various therapeutic areas, the negotiation of licensing and alliance agreements with biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies worldwide, and the partnering, spin-out and out-licensing of company pharmaceutical and biotechnology assets. Prior to moving into those roles, Mr. Musing was Vice President Marketing International for the Janssen Pharmaceutical Group of Companies Worldwide from March 1982 to December 1984; President of Pitman-Moore, Inc., a U.S.-based Johnson & Johnson company from January 1985 to June 1987; Managing Director of Janssen Pharmaceutical in Portugal from July 1987 to March 1990; President of Serono, Inc. in the United States and Executive Vice President with responsibilities for North and South America from April 1990 to January 1993; Member of the board of directors of Ortho Biotech, Inc. from January 1993 to October 1999; and Managing Director of Ortho Biotech in France (a Johnson & Johnson affiliate) from October 1999 to January 2003. From January 2003 to his retirement in September 2010, Mr. Musing served as Vice President, Licensing and Acquisitions for the Pharmaceutical Group at Johnson & Johnson, where he was responsible for the worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products in all therapeutic areas. He has served as a director of Delphi Digital, Inc. since March 2012 and Chairman of the Scientific Board of Advisors for Noble Capital Financial Markets since February 2012. Mr. Musing also served as a director of iBio, Inc. [NYSE MKT: IBIO] from July 2011 to December 2012. We believe Mr. Musing's more than 36-years' experience in the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry, including the establishment of numerous strategic and global partnerships and various new product collaborations provide the requisite qualifications, skills, perspectives, and experience that make him well qualified to serve on our Board of Directors. Mr. Musing received his Master's Degree in Biological Sciences from the University of Brussels (Belgium) and his Graduate Degree in Economics and Financial Sciences from the University of Antwerp (Belgium).
		
Source: TherapeuticsMD, Inc. on 04/25/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jules A. Musing's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Jules A. Musing. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jules A. Musing's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jules A. Musing's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jules A. Musing through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Jules A. Musing


















Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















">
		

Musing Jules A in Highland Beach, FL (Import & export history)
































 










Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Musing Jules A, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Musing Jules A

Musing Jules A imports from Veco Meubelcharme N V in Netherlands through the port of Miami, Florida        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Musing Jules A and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 NINTENDO OF AMERICA INC.
 PEPSICO
 INTEL TECHNOLOGY SDN BHD
 TOYS R-US (WAREHOUSE #0083)
 GENERAL MOTORS CANADA LIMITED
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Musing Jules A
Musing Jules A imports from Veco Meubelcharme N V in Netherlands through the port of Miami, Florida


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



VECO MEUBELCHARME N V
LAGE KAART 460 BRASSCHAAT 2930 BE


MUSING JULES A
311 STREET SOUTH OCEAN BOULEVARD APP 903 HIGHLAND BEACH, FL 33487 US



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



MUSING JULES A
311 STREET SOUTH OCEAN BOULEVARD APP 903 HIGHLAND BEACH, FL 33487 US



MUSING USA
MUSING USA





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



CMDURTM0731474


GESU2952231
GESU2952231


Product Description




FURNITURE HS CODE 94035000
FURNITURE HS CODE 94035000









Bill of LadingSHPTMIA90104072Arrival Date2016-10-22Weight (LB)2,420Weight (KG)1,100UnitsCMQuantity2 PKGContainer Count1Voyage No.147VBPort of LoadingROTTERDAMPort of DischargeMIAMI, FLORIDAVessel NameHAWK HUNTERCarrier CodeSHPTCountry Of OriginNetherlandsPlace Of ReceiptANTWERP 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Musing Jules A. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Musing Jules A has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Musing Jules A







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Musing Jules A
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Denis Gibson                                



                                    Yoolim                                



                                    Wynstan                                



                                    Global Transportation Management Gt                                



                                    Huzhou Jiuxing Import Export Coltd                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.3757
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X














    Jules Musing | Johnson & Johnson Inc | ZoomInfo.com






















 



 Jules Musing to Lead Business Development Effort 
         










    










 






 











 









Jules Musing to Lead Business Development Effort

Dec 07, 2011, 07:00 ET
		  		  					
						 from   iBio, Inc. 











 
















































 

 




















 


NEWARK, Del., Dec. 7, 2011 /PRNewswire/ -- iBio, Inc. (NYSE AMEX:   IBIO) today announced that Jules A. Musing, an iBio Director, will assume a role as a Managing Director of the Company for at least the next six months in order to accelerate the Company's business development activity.  Mr. Musing, formerly a Senior Executive at Johnson & Johnson, joined iBio's Board of Directors in June of 2011.  In the course of his career in the Pharmaceutical and Biotechnology Industry, Mr. Musing has been President and Managing Director for Johnson & Johnson, Janssen Pharmaceutica, and Ares Serono companies.  At Johnson & Johnson, Mr. Musing was also responsible for worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products and technologies and the establishment of strategic alliances.  His activities included the establishment of new scientific and product collaborations in various therapeutic areas, the negotiation of licensing and alliance agreements with biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies worldwide, and the partnering, spin-out and out-licensing of company pharmaceutical and biotechnology assets.
In his role as an iBio Managing Director, Mr. Musing will focus on the Company's business development and licensing activities, including direct dealings with third parties and development of human and material resources to enlarge the Company's business development capacity.
"Jules will help us expand our business development capability rapidly to deal with the product candidates already developed on our platform and those we expect in the next few months," said Robert B. Kay, iBio's Chairman and CEO.  "We expect Jules' experience as a deal maker and his access to senior management in potential users of our technologies to lead to important business opportunities for us in a variety of U.S. and international markets. We are most fortunate to have his participation during this stage of our growth."
About iBio, Inc.
iBio develops and offers product applications of its iBioLaunch™ platform, providing collaborators full support for turn-key implementation of its technology for both proprietary and biosimilar products. The iBioLaunch platform is a proprietary, transformative technology for development and production of biologics using transient gene expression in unmodified green plants. The technology has been applied successfully to proteins difficult or impossible to produce with other methods, as well as proteins representative of most important classes of biologic pharmaceuticals. Advantages of the iBioLaunch platform over other systems include enablement of rapid development and validation of modular, scalable, and optionally robotic, multi-product manufacturing facilities; production time measured in weeks instead of months or more; product entry that is unconstrained by traditional process patents; and significantly lower capital and operating costs for comparable production. Further information is available at: www.ibioinc.com. 
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements included in this news release related to iBio, Inc. may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements involve a number of risks and uncertainties such as competitive factors, technological development, market demand, and the Company's ability to obtain new contracts and accurately estimate net revenues due to variability in size, scope and duration of projects. Further information on potential risk factors that could affect the Company's financial results can be found in the company's Reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. 
 



Contacts:


 


 



 


 


 



Corporate:


Investor:


 



 


 


 



Robert Erwin, President


Douglas Beck, CFO


 



iBio, Inc.


iBio, Inc.


 



302-355-2335


302-355-0923


 



rerwin@ibioinc.com


ir@ibioinc.com


 

 
 SOURCE  iBio, Inc.  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.ibioinc.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Jan 09, 2012, 16:38 ET
Preview: iBio, Inc. Announces Proposed Public Offering













Nov 30, 2011, 07:00 ET
Preview: iBio, Inc. Submits Plan to Satisfy NYSE Amex Continued Listing Standards






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 






Jules Musing | Directors and Boards
























Skip to main content










Login
 Username *
 Password *


GO >
Forgot password?  Not a Subscriber? 

















Search form
Search











Toggle navigation






















 













Mr. Jules A. MusingTherapeuticsMD Inc.Boca Raton, FLHe was a senior executive at Johnson & Johnson, where his responsibilities included worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products and technologies. He currently is chairman of the scientific advisory board of Noble Capital Financial Markets. Also is a director of Delphi Digital Inc.2011 Second QuarterAdded to: iBio Inc. - Newark, DEiBio is a biopharmaceutical company focused on the treatment of infectious diseases. Revenues are $1 million.















 















 











Jules Musing, Former Senior Executive at Johnson & Johnson, Joins Variant Pharmaceuticals' Board of Directors - MarketWatch

















































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings




















press release


					Oct. 20, 2016, 6:40 a.m. EDT
				
Jules Musing, Former Senior Executive at Johnson & Johnson, Joins Variant Pharmaceuticals' Board of Directors
Advancing Variant's mission to build a leading specialty pharmaceutical company


























WESTON, Fla., Oct. 20, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Variant Pharmaceuticals, Inc., an emerging specialty pharmaceutical company developing first-in-class drugs for patients with rare diseases, announced today that its Board of Directors has appointed Jules Musing, former Senior Executive at Johnson & Johnson, as a Director of the Board.


                                        








Mr. Musing, in the course of his 36-year career, has been responsible for worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical and biotechnology products, as well as creation of strategic alliances and partnerships on a global basis. Under his leadership, numerous multi-million dollar deals were executed with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies worldwide. He has been President of Johnson & Johnson companies in the US and Europe, and he was on the Board of Johnson & Johnson companies in Germany, France, Italy, and the UK. Mr. Musing has been a member of the Management Board of Ortho Biotech (a J&J Biotechnology Company) in the US and Europe, CEO and President of Ares Serono, Inc. in the US, and Executive Vice President with responsibilities for Ares Serono companies in North and Latin America.


                                        








"Along with his knowledge of and passion for creating global pharmaceutical and biotechnology strategic alliances and partnerships, and brokering deals," said Stephen Glover, Founder and CEO of Variant Pharmaceuticals, "Jules Musing will bring to our Board his unique expertise to help optimize the value of our rare disease product portfolio". 


                                        

About Variant









Variant Pharmaceuticals, an emerging pharmaceutical company focusing on restoring health and transforming the lives of patients with rare diseases through innovation, was established in 2014, with the mission to become a leading specialty pharmaceutical company.  Our evolving product pipeline is targeted to the $100+ billion orphan drug market. Our lead orphan drug candidate is hydroxypropyl beta cyclodextrin (HPβCD) for chronic treatment of two orphan indications, VAR 200: Focal Segmental Glomerulosclerosis (FSGS) and VAR 300: Alport Syndrome (AS), rare progressive forms of kidney disease.   


                                        








Logo -         http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20151217/297056LOGO









To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:        http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/jules-musing-former-senior-executive-at-johnson--johnson-joins-variant-pharmaceuticals-board-of-directors-300347574.html









SOURCE  Variant Pharmaceuticals, Inc.


                                        








Copyright (C) 2016 PR Newswire. All rights reserved
                    








































Most Popular





1.





Commodities Corner

Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017






2.





MarketWatch First Take

AMD earnings give investors what they wanted — now it must deliver on servers






3.






Don’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs






4.





In One Chart

The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart






5.






Valerian: Luc Besson's $180 Million Indie Film








Find a Broker

Partner Center »























Featured Stories





Seeing America again through new eyes







How to dig yourself out of debt







Move over, Tesla? Karma unveils its hybrid sports car







The salary you need to afford a home in these 25 cities







Why OPEC will never cut production again













Log In




7:04 AM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:04aFord Motor sees 2017 adj. EPS $1.65-$1.85; FactSet consensus $1.51
7:03aFord Motor Q2 revenue $39.85 bln vs. $39.49 bln a year ago; FactSet consensus $37.28 bln
7:03aFord Motor Q2 adj. EPS 56 cents; FactSet consensus 43 cents
7:02aFord shares up 1.6% premarket
7:02aFord Motor Q2 EPS 51 cents vs. 49 cents a year ago
7:02aShares of AT&T are up 2.6% in premarket
7:01aCoca-Cola's stock jumps 1.4% premarket after Q2 results
7:01aWhat Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks
7:00aCoca-Cola previous 2017 adj. EPS outlook was down 1% to down 3%
7:00a3 Cheap Growth Stocks for Any Market
7:00aShopping Around for Better Savings Rates
7:00aUPS earnings: How much will Prime packages cut into margins?
6:59aCoca-Cola sees 2017 adj. EPS flat to down 2%; FactSet consensus of $1.88 implies 1.6% decline
6:59aBarnes & Noble stock jumps 17% after investor urges it to go private
6:58aVerizon earnings: Can you hear me now? Verizon’s search for success outside wireless
6:58aCoca-Cola Q2 revenue fell 16% to $9.70 bln from $11.54 bln; FactSet consensus $9.65 bln
6:57aCoca-Cola Q2 adj. EPS 59 cents; FactSet consensus 57 cents
6:57aCoca-Cola Q2 EPS 32 cents vs. 79 cents a year ago
6:56aFacebook earnings: After a sudden change,  Instagram is in focus
6:56aNorthrop Grumman profit and sales rise, beat expectations
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


























































 



Jules A. Müsing Joins iBio’s Board of Directors | Business Wire
























































Jules A. Müsing Joins iBio’s Board of Directors






June 22, 2011 08:00 AM Eastern Daylight Time



NEWARK, Del.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--iBio, Inc. (NYSE AMEX: IBIO) announced today the appointment of 
      Jules A. Müsing, formerly a senior executive at Johnson & Johnson, to 
      iBio’s Board of Directors.
    


      In the course of his career at Johnson & Johnson, Mr. Müsing was 
      responsible for worldwide licensing and acquisition of pharmaceutical 
      and biotechnology products and technologies and the establishment of 
      strategic alliances. This included the establishment of new scientific 
      and product collaborations in various therapeutic areas, the negotiation 
      of licensing and alliance agreements with biotechnology and 
      pharmaceutical companies worldwide, and the partnering, spin-out and 
      out-licensing of company pharmaceutical and biotechnology assets. Prior 
      to moving into that role, Mr. Müsing was Vice President Marketing 
      International for the Janssen Pharmaceutica Group of Companies 
      Worldwide; President of Pitman-Moore, Inc., a U.S.-based Johnson & 
      Johnson company; Managing Director of Janssen Pharmaceutica in Portugal; 
      President of Serono, Inc. in the U.S. and Executive Vice President with 
      responsibilities for North and South America; Member of the Board of 
      Ortho Biotech, Inc.; and Managing Director of Ortho Biotech in France (a 
      Johnson & Johnson affiliate).
    

      “In addition to undertaking normal Board responsibilities, Jules has 
      indicated an interest in playing an active role in the further 
      development of iBio’s business and licensing programs,” said Robert B. 
      Kay, iBio’s Executive Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. “I expect 
      his experience and relationships to significantly advance our 
      commercialization activities.”
    

About iBio, Inc.


      iBio develops and offers product applications of its iBioLaunch™ 
      platform, offering collaborators full support for turn-key 
      implementation of its technology for both proprietary and biosimilar 
      products. The iBioLaunch platform is a proprietary, transformative 
      technology for development and production of biologics using transient 
      gene expression in unmodified green plants. Advantages over other 
      systems include: success with proteins difficult or impossible to 
      produce with other methods; broadly applicable to biologics, including 
      monoclonal antibodies, other therapeutic proteins and vaccines; enables 
      rapid development and validation of modular, scalable, and optionally 
      robotic, multi-product manufacturing facilities; production time 
      measured in weeks instead of months or more. Additional benefits include 
      a practically unlimited surge capacity for remedial action against 
      bioterrorism and pandemic disease; product entry that is unconstrained 
      by traditional process patents, and significantly lower capital and 
      operating costs for comparable production. Further information is 
      available at: www.ibioinc.com.
    

Forward-Looking Statements


Statements included in this news release related to iBio, Inc. may 
      constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private 
      Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements involve 
      a number of risks and uncertainties such as competitive factors, technological 
      development, market demand, and the Company's ability to obtain new 
      contracts and accurately estimate net revenues due to variability 
      in size, scope and duration of projects. Further information on 
      potential risk factors that could affect the Company's financial results 
      can be found in the company's Reports filed with the Securities and 
      Exchange Commission.





Contacts

      iBio, Inc.Corporate:Robert 
      Erwin, President302-355-2335rerwin@ibioinc.comorInvestor 
      Contact:Laurie S. Roop, 302-355-9452ir@ibioinc.com
















Release Summary
Former Johnson & Johnson executive, a seasoned professional with in-depth experience in bio-tech, Jules A. Musing, joins iBio, Inc.'s Board of Directors.






Contacts

      iBio, Inc.Corporate:Robert 
      Erwin, President302-355-2335rerwin@ibioinc.comorInvestor 
      Contact:Laurie S. Roop, 302-355-9452ir@ibioinc.com









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up
































A Musing Jules

































































































































































Friday, March 31, 2017








Trading a house for a home







If you're not familiar with my adventures in restoration, read my love story post first. Actually, even if you ARE familiar... go re-read that post. It's good context! (I'll wait...)


If you're the kind of person who moves into a house and never changes the paint colors, this post won't resonate with you.  But for the rest of you, you know how it feels to put a little bit of your style into a house. Maybe you've stripped wallpaper or pulled back the carpet to find hardwood floors hidden underneath. A few hours worth of work and you've fixed, cleaned or replaced something. You've made it better. 

I bought my last house when I was a young, optimistic, single woman. Over the next four years, I would repair or replace every single wall, ceiling, floor, door, light fixture, electrical outlet and piece of trim. That's no exaggeration.  I gutted all 4 bathrooms and rebuilt them from the floor up.  I gutted and rebuilt the kitchen. I put in all new lighting, floors and major systems (HVAC, roof, electrical panel). I took down walls, fixed beams, and sistered joists. I had help from friends, family, and a few contractors. All told, I spent 208 weekends working on that house.


I saved the place.   And then, not long after I finished, I decided to sell it. 

I think a decaying house is like a bad marriage. It takes years of neglect to create the problems, but with hard work, you can almost always fix it. And I believe in fixing what can be fixed. Saving what other people deem "a lost cause."  But, imagine spending 4 years in couples counseling.  After 4 years of hard work, you wake up one morning, look at your partner and realize you have the exact marriage you've always wanted. It's perfect and you're content.  And then you ask for a divorce.

That's exactly what I did.  I sold my house in January of 2014. I just went back for the first time a few weeks ago. Driving up to the house, I felt so many emotions.  The new owners painted the exterior, replacing the sunny yellow with a shade of grayish blue. I'd like to tell you the color is all wrong, but in fact, it looks lovely.  Other than that, it's exactly the same as the day I left.  But, what was once the "love of my life" was now, just a house.

That's the lesson, I think.  A house is just a house. It's 4 walls and a roof.  It keeps you warm and safe and dry. I realize now that after 4 years of restoring that house, I loved it, but it still wasn't a home.  A house becomes a home when it's filled with love, family, memories, laughter, tears, fights, make-ups, dreams and hopes. A home holds all the beauty and love and heart that you bring to it.



After I sold my house, I traveled Europe for 3.5 months. Read about my European meltdown here. And then moved back to Michigan.  I fell madly in love and my life changed forever.   We moved to Chicago and we've created a home filled with laughter, the pitter-patter of little feet, with squeals of joy, family dinners, fights, make-ups, forts, bedtime stories and long discussions about our future.

Rich and I will buy a house soon enough, a place for our family to put down roots. But now I know...anywhere I go with these boys, I'm home.
















Mused by



Jules




at

4:15 PM





2 comments:
    
















Email ThisBlogThis!Share to TwitterShare to FacebookShare to Pinterest




Labels:
Atlanta,
children,
family,
home,
house,
love,
marriage,
old fourth ward,
renovation,
restoration

















Thursday, March 30, 2017








Prom dress to be proud of









Oh, I've gotta rant!   


I was enjoying my coffee this morning and came across this article on HuffPo Women.   Mine may not be a popular opinion, but as I read this article, I was really annoyed, for a variety of reasons. Totally blog-worthy.

The short story is that these 4 photos were hung up a Florida high school. The three most revealing dresses indicate that they won't be acceptable for prom. The fourth (less revealing) dress indicated they're welcome at prom and says "good girl."  After reading the article, it sounds like a staff member put up the photos, but it was not approved by the administration, nor was it an "official" school poster.







First and foremost, let me say that the "good girl" line related to a young woman's clothing choice is condescending and abhorrent.  Girls and women aren't "good" or "bad" based on what they wear, and the phrasing of "good girl" is just gross and sexist and pejorative. 

NEVERTHELESS...

I don't think that a poster encouraging modesty and decency for prom should cause this huge uproar, and certainly NOT an uproar in the name of "standing up against sexism" and "women's/girls rights."  It's great to see young people getting involved, standing up for something and making their voices heard, but this is not an atrocity against women. 

Women all around the world are still subjected to genuine horrors like female genital mutilation, forced marriages, bride burning, marital rape, date rape, sex trafficking, and more. Don't get me started on rampant gender inequality and sexism.  
Please, stand up against sexism and atrocities against women. But the high school poster is NOT that.  This is a suggestion of decency in a time when young women are all too eager to bare everything.  

Being told to cover up isn't a war on women. It's part of life. Parents should be teaching their kids what's appropriate, including how to dress.  Not to get off on another tangent, but the reason things like this are being posted is because parents don't parent! My mom would have died before she'd let me wear something like this. 







Source: Rue the Day, Luulla and XDresses.com



Can you wear whatever dress you want? Yes
Does a revealing dress make you a "bad girl"?  No
Does it mean that boys/men can take advantage of you, call you names, or touch you? No
Does it mean that you're a slut?  No
Should men judge you by your outfit? Maybe not.


Do people (male and female) make assumptions about you based on your clothing? YES, OF COURSE!! 

Sorry, girls. But, them's the facts.
In modern culture, our image is carefully cultivated. Every style choice you make says something about who you are. Celebrities and actors carefully choose every element of every outfit in order to cultivate a very specific image and "brand" for themselves.  (Well, they have stylists who do that, obvs.)  Why do they do that?  Because the clothing you wear says A LOT about you. Young women cannot be naive to this fact. 



Jackie Kennedy carefully cultivated her image.

And so has Nikki Minaj. 




Women can't continue to behave and dress in a sexually precocious manner, while simultaneously saying "don't treat me as a sex object."  You can't have it both ways, ladies.  Again, I'll reiterate that I'm NOT victim blaming. No girl or woman should ever be victimized, harassed or attacked as a result of her clothing choices, no matter how risque. Nothing you do, say or wear justifies indecent or criminal behavior by a boy or man. But your clothing choice DOES say something about you.  

If you want to be shown respect, demonstrate self-respect.   


If you want to be treated like a lady, you'll need to act like one. 
Back to the article.  I understand the students didn't like that poster.  I understand that they don't want to be shamed and I completely agree the tone and the language used was outrageous. But this isn't sexism. It isn't an assult on your rights as a woman.  It's a message of modesty, and it's a decent message.

 “Unfortunately what happened here is a symptom of what is still happening to girls in this country – this over-sexualization of our bodies and emphasis on it,” she said. “Girls are made to feel responsible for what a boy ‘might do or feel’ in response to how we dress. Dress codes are grossly outdated for 2017.”  -Lily WIllimgton, student at Stanton College Prep
I'm sorry, but no, Lily from Stanton College Prep.  You have it all wrong. The person telling y'all to dress more modestly isn't the one over-sexualizing your bodies. You girls are doing that to yourselves.  





 









Mused by



Jules




at

12:04 PM





No comments:
    
















Email ThisBlogThis!Share to TwitterShare to FacebookShare to Pinterest




Labels:
huffpo,
huffpo women,
prom,
stantoncollegeprep

















Saturday, March 15, 2014








Princess castles, waterfalls and magic







After spending a few days in Munich, I drove 80 miles south to a tiny Bavarian town called Schwangau, Germany. This is where I found a little bit of magic, whimsy and fantasy on my trip. The famous Neuschwanstein castle!

King Ludwig II of Bavaria built the massive Neuschwanstein castle in honor of his favorite composer (and source of his secret romantic crush), Richard Wagner. He was reportedly infatuated with Wagner and wanted the castle to be a shrine to his works, as well as place for the performance of his operas.

The castle is the real life depiction of every gorgeous, opulent princess castle I'd ever seen or dreamed of as a little girl.  In fact, Walt Disney and his wife, Lillian, had taken a European tour before he built Disneyland and they visited the Neuschwanstein castle. Mr. Disney was so awestruck by the castle, it became the inspiration for Sleeping Beauty and Cinderella's castles. See for yourself:






I can certainly see similarities!  To tour the castle, I parked at the bottom of the mountain, paid for admittance, and boarded a shuttle bus that took me to the top of the mountain. After dozen of hairpin turns and twists, the shuttle dropped me and my fellow visitors off at the top, a short walk away from the castle itself.

Part of the magical experience of visiting Neuschwanstein is the incredible walk up to the castle. There is a long path and the castle ispartially hidden,  tucked away behind trees, so as you walk, slowly, turrets and spires come into sight one by one. When I rounded the last corner, the entire castle came into view and nearly took my breath away.

Gorgeous doesn't begin to describe it. It's magical, grandiose and stunning.  I spent about 30 minutes slowly wandering around the outside, taking it all in.  As I strolled, I walked through crowds of visitors from all over the world.  There were dozens of little girls wearing princess dresses. They walked around, waiting to go in the castle, wearing tiny ball gown and princess dresses of white and pink tulle. It was so sweet, I remembered what it felt like to be 5 years old again, twirling around the living room like a princess. I secretly wished I had a princess dress on, too, instead of jeans. What can I say? The place is magical.

Only one side of Neuschwanstein is approachable by foot. On all other sides of the Bavarian castle, the ground drops off in sheer bluffs.  It's absolutely jaw dropping.






After a short wait, my group was ushered inside for the tour. Originally, King Ludwig designed the castle to have more than 200+ rooms dedicated to the performance and appreciation of Wagner's works. 200 rooms...!  In contrast, the White House has just 132 rooms.  Although, the massive Buckingham Palace has 775 rooms, with 78 of them bathrooms! Imagine cleaning 78 toilets.  Ugh. 

But I digress.  Despite the plan for 200+ rooms in  Neuschwanstein castle, only 14 were ever finished. Construction began in 1869 and went on for more than 16 years. Sadly, Richard Wagner died in 1883, having never visited Neuschwanstein, and King Ludwig was devastated.  Just three years later (1886), he was declared insane and died mysteriously 3 days after his diagnosis. After his death, because of the massive debt King Ludwig amassed, his family opened Neuschwanstein to visitors.

Today, visitors can only tour the 14 completed rooms. Nothing can prepare a visitor for the dripping, gilded, opulent interior. His eccentric style is distinct and in my opinion, overwhelming to the senses. Every inch of every wall, floor, ceiling, surface was embellished in some way. 

My favorite room was the Throne Room. The massive focal point is a chandelier, designed to look like the Byzantine crown.  It weighs over 2,000 lbs!










The castle is full of tapestries, murals of Wagner's works, gilded walls, mirrors and picture frames.




And more incredible chandeliers!




My senses were overloaded during the entire tour, but in a great way.  It was gorgeous, opulent and over the top!   It's hard not to get a little caught up in the love story, as well.  Imagine love so strong that a person would devote their life to honoring another, or building something so massive in their honor. Men built the Taj Mahal and Neuschwanstein, so perhaps men are the romantic gender?  Certainly not in my personal experience...




As I left the castle, I veered off the path to stop on the Marienbrucke bridge.  The long, narrow bridge stretches over a stream and several waterfalls and has an unbeatable view of the castle.  It feels as if this must be the very spot King Ludwig stood when he was designing the castle.  And for all I know, maybe it was.






I'm not a big fan of bridges, especially ancient ones that are just wooden planks with GAPS between the planks. Seriously, gaps! I prefer my bridges to be steel and secure.  But, despite my fear, I did walk out to the middle and allowed the tranquility of the place to wash over me.

There is no denying that King Ludwig II of Bavaria was a strange man. His unrequited romantic obsession with Richard Wagner took over his life, bankrupted him and broke his heart.  But that passion also gave his life purpose. His passion led him to build this gorgeous castle, which has brought millions of people joy and happiness. It inspired Walt Disney, who in turn, shaped the imaginations of millions of little girls about what a princess castle looks like. It inspired Disneyland, and surely inspires the millions of visitors that flock there every year. It's magical and romantic. 

I stood on the bridge for so long that I missed the last shuttle down the mountain.  The sky was turning gorgeous shades of orange and the castle was transformed in front of my eyes.  As the sun set over Neuschwanstein, I felt optimistic. Maybe someday, I'd have someone in my life who wants to build me a castle.

As I started the long, slow walk down the mountain, I looked around a few times to make sure I was alone.   And then, I did a few little twirls in my imaginary princess dress. 










Mused by



Jules




at

11:24 PM





No comments:
    
















Email ThisBlogThis!Share to TwitterShare to FacebookShare to Pinterest




Labels:
Bavaria,
Europe,
germany,
King Ludwig,
Neuschwanstein,
princess,
Richard Wagner,
romance,
Walt Disney











Friday, March 14, 2014








Munich





March 12th and 13th
I’m in Munich, Germany!





For some reason I cannot explain, Germany was
never high on my travel list.  I have
always been drawn to destinations like Ireland, Paris or Italy and not as
interested in places like Germany or Poland. 
Then, my parents lived in Germany last year for 3 months and raved about
it.  I visited Austria in February and
loved it. I learned there are obviously a lot of similarities between Austria
and Germany and my interest started to grow. 
I began suspecting that my German-disinterest was all-wrong. So, when I
started to plan my route coming back from Prague to Italy, I realized I could
come back through Munich. I decided to check it out.






I’m so glad that I did.  I found that Germany was much different than
my expectations. It’s a wonderful country with a fascinating history, distinct
regions, amazing architecture, delicious food and warm, friendly people.  I’m about half German and it was comforting to
walk around a country where everyone looked like me…blonde hair, blue eyes and
fairly tall. I felt right at home…which certainly is not the case in Italy,
where my pale skin and blonde tresses stands out!
I only had 1.5 days in Munich, so I tried to move
fast and experience as much as possible! The first morning, I took the subway to
Marienplatz, the heart of Munich.  The first thing you see as you come out of the
subway at Marienplatz is the impressive Neuen Rathaus, or New City Hall.  It's awesome!






The building houses the famous glockenspiel
and I timed my visit to catch the 12 o’clock chiming. Now, I’m not a clock buff
or anything, but the glockenspiel was so charming!  At the top of the clock tower, you can see a little alcove where the automated little
men are dancing, then they joust with one another, and one is victorious! There is a a SHORT video showing you the glockenspiel here. 

Next, I toured the Munich Residenz, a massive complex of buildings that was the former house of the Bavarian monarchs.  I swear, I love touring castles, residences, palaces and mansions. It is so much fun to see how the other half lives...and it makes me feel so poor. How can you not feel poor as you stroll through rooms like this...


















I particularly liked strolling through the rooms that contained the treasures of the monarchy. My absolute favorite piece was the traveling set of Empress Marie Louise of Austria, the second wife of Napoleon. It was made in 1812 by the most famous goldsmith of that time, Martin Guillaume Biennais.
I love secret things... secret rooms, passageways, hidden things, secret boxes, etc.  And this set has tons of hidden areas and items that fold into it. It actually contains 120 items, including dinner service for 2, a toiletry set, writing implements, sewing tools, a measuring rod, screwdriver, even dental instruments. It's made of silver-gilt, mother-of-pearl, tortoise shell, ivory and ebony.  The photo does NOT do it justice. 









My favorite room in the massive Residenz was the Antiquarium, which was the biggest room I've ever seen.  I took photo and video, but I still feel that nothing quite captures how big the space was.















After I left the Residenz, I strolled the streets of Munich, talking with people, window shopping and finally, finding my way to Der Pschorr Bier Garten to try to drink a beer. These videos say it all! 






It's true, I'm not a beer drinker. I've never had more than a few sips before pouring myself a whiskey or wine instead.  But, I really wanted the bragging rights of saying I drank my first full beer in Germany.  





I think it helped that I paired my Hacker Pschorr Heifevisen with some delicious weinerschnitzel and roasted potatoes.  





And before long... 





The bartender had told each of the servers that I was drinking my first beer (in German, so I didn't realize). I had wondered why they were all so friendly.  Well, when I finished, they clapped for me.  I love Germany!


The next day I had only a few more hours in Munich. I decided to head to Hofbrauhaus for my second beer. That was a huge mistake.  Hofbrauhaus only has 2 beers.  Dark and regular.  I tried the regular, which was bitter and awful. I choked down 2 sips and left the rest - I know, beer crime! I did love the charm of the Hofbrauhaus, though, and strolled around looking at the stein cages and girls in traditional dress selling pretzels.  

I spent a few hours strolling and shopping, admiring cuckoo clocks, buying gifts and a few beer steins.  And then, far too soon, it was time to leave Munich and head to the Neuschwanstein Castle.  

Germany was an awesome surprise. I can't wait to return to Munich and explore the rest of the country.  But next on my itinerary is the Neuschwanstein Castle, about 80 kilometers south of Munich.

Auf Weidersehen (goodnight!)













Mused by



Jules




at

3:09 AM





No comments:
    
















Email ThisBlogThis!Share to TwitterShare to FacebookShare to Pinterest




Labels:
adventure,
beer,
bier garten,
Der Pschorr,
Euro Adventure,
germany,
Hofbrauhaus,
Munich,
weinerschnitzel











Wednesday, March 12, 2014








Prague, Art Deco, the Golden Lane and tiny homes







March 10 and 11

The drive Vienna, Austria north to Prague, Czech Republic is quite pretty. The drive took me through small towns, villages and vineyards that dotted the otherwise quiet landscape  There were long stretches where I saw no other cars.  I loved that.




As I crossed into Czech Republic, the afternoon was turning to evening. I watched as the sky turned from blue to gorgeous orange and red.




And just as the sun melted down into the horizon, I passed by a gorgeous, still, mirror-surface lake.  I snapped photos as I drove.




I arrived into Prague around 8 pm exhausted. My hotel is the spectacular art deco Hotel Paris.  It's located next to the Municipal House, which was the former site of the Royal Court Palace, the home of the great King Wenceslas IV (from the song!) from 1382 to 1486.  At that time, the Habsburgs took power and weren't interested in using the palace. It fell into disrepair and was later torn down. In its place, the Municipal House was built in 1905.  It is the best example of Prague Art Nouveau architecture standing today.  It's simply gorgeous.


I was super excited to find I'd been given a suite (for no extra cost) simply because I'd asked for a room with a view.  I was on the top floor, corner room with views on two sides. My room was pretty great...and fairly inexpensive!  The benefits of traveling during the off season!

The entrance door was French doors... ALWAYS a good sign.




It had a big, comfortable bed...




 And a massive bathroom...






The next morning, I could truly appreciate the views. From the bathroom, I had stunning views of the top of the Prague Municipal House directly next door.







And from the other windows, I had a view out over Old Town Prague and the Astronomical Clock Tower.






The next morning, I headed to Prague castle. The castle is across the Charles Bridge and up in the hills overlooking the Vitava river. It's the highest building in the below photo.





The Prague castle complex is very large and full of museums. I focused my tour on St. Vitus cathedral, the Old Royal Palace, St. George Basilica, the Golden Lane, and the Powder Bridge.
At the entrance to the castle are armed guards and much like in London, there is a hourly changing of the guards. 




It must be so hard to stand perfectly still while tourists like me take selfies with you.  Ha!







Inside the Prague Castle complex, the St. Vitus' cathedral was absolutely stunning.  The below photo is one of my favorites, but the cathedral's massive size makes it difficult to get it all in one shot.




The second shot gives great perspective for the scale of the cathedral. Just look how big those doors are...about 20 feet tall!





My favorite part of the Castle was the Golden Lane. A row of tiny, miniature houses are literally glued to one of the walls of the castle. Legend says that the row of houses was originally inhabited by the castle goldsmiths, hence the name Golden Lane.  Throughout the years, the tiny houses were inhabited by merchants, goldsmiths, alchemists and marksmen who worked at the castle.




The tiny homes are only about 8-10 feet deep, so as not to intrude out into the street.  The entire street feels as though it was built for hobbits instead of real people. You have to stoop to get through the small doorways. I stopped at each house and loved how cozy and charming they were. Some of the houses had just a single bed, a small dresser, a chair, and a wood burning oven for both heat and cooking.  Originally, the homes didn't have running water. In fact, the last house to get indoor plumbing was in the 1970s.  I just loved how charming the houses here were.






After touring the castle, I went back to the hotel to rest and get gussied up.  That evening, I went to a chamber orchestra performance at the Municipal State House next to my hotel.  I absolutely loved listening to the violins, violas, cellos and basses play Vivaldi, Handle, Mozart, Bach and more.  They were truly exceptional.

I had dinner at a steakhouse in Prague called Casa de Argentina. Because what do you want to eat in the Czech Republic but Argentinian food, amiright?   I had an amazing steak there and plenty of red wine.  I was the only woman in the restaurant and that made for great people (men)-watching. The men at a nearby table bought me dessert, which was delicious. My server was gorgeous and we flirted wildly for the 2 hours I was there. There are certainly many benefits to solo travel...flirty waiters is one of them! I blogged while I ate, finished my half-bottle of wine and strolled back to my hotel enjoying the warm evening breeze.  All in all, a great day in Prague.

On Wednesday, I spent the day walking around the Old Town Square of Prague. I went to the top of the clock tower and even tried to make sense of the Astronomical Clock, which is impossible!





Next, I strolled along the Charles Bridge and did some great shopping for friends and family. The bridge is beautiful...second only to the Chain Bridge I saw in Budapest.





I kept wandering the streets and found an old used bookstore with English books. My tradition continued when I bought a book by a Czech writer recommended to me by the owner. Can't wait to read it.

In the afternoon, I toured the Jewish Museum and Cemetery. I'm always drawn to the Jewish History Museums but leave crying, depressed and disgusted by how evil human beings can be. But, in my opinion, travel throughout Europe just isn't complete without trying to understand and learn about the history of each country and the events leading up to the World Wars.

The history, scenery, architecture, art and people of Prague were wonderful. I loved
the city and would visit again in a heartbeat. 


Up next, I travel to Munich, Germany!







Mused by



Jules




at

3:07 AM





No comments:
    
















Email ThisBlogThis!Share to TwitterShare to FacebookShare to Pinterest




Labels:
Astronomical Clock,
Charles Bridge,
Czech Republic,
Golden Lane,
pinned,
Prague,
Prague Castle,
St Vitus













Older Posts

Home




Subscribe to:
Posts (Atom)


























Love my blog?



















Search This Blog




























Blog Archive





March (2)
      

March (7)
      

February (16)
      

January (9)
      

December (1)
      

November (1)
      

October (2)
      

August (1)
      

April (1)
      

March (1)
      

February (1)
      

January (2)
      

November (1)
      

October (1)
      

September (2)
      

August (2)
      





















About Jules





Jules


I love travel, photography, reading, writing, good food, red wine, cooking, baking, philosophy, architecture, and being crafty. I talk too much, laugh with my head thrown back and believe that laughter is the best medicine.  

View my complete profile











Popular Posts









Budapest: Goulash, the Rubik's Cube and Katy Perry 
  March 6 and 7   Szia from Budapest, Hungary!  This just might be my new favorite city in the world!        I liked Hungary immediately. Th...










Innsbruck Austria, the snowboarder and Patrick Dempsey
Feb 10th and 11th- Innsbruck, Austria!     After a great weekend in Milan, I went back to my apartment in Vicenza and picked up my rental ca...










Please, pass the tissues.
 If you're not familiar with my adventures in restoration, read the post HERE  before you continue.   See the finished product...my full...















Follow via email






























Blogs I Love

Inside The Travel Lab Reading Italian Maps An Italian In Rome Apartment Therapy Baby Boom Centsational GirlHooked On HousesHouse of TurquoiseP.S.... I Made This Retro Ranch RenovationYoung House Love

























































JulesMusing (@MusingJules) | Twitter



























Skip to content









Home
Home
Home, current page.






Moments
Moments
Moments, current page.






Search query



Search Twitter









Searches you follow






    Follow
  

    Following
  

    Unfollow
  






Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @




















Language: English 



 



Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
English UK
Español
Filipino
Français
Hrvatski
Italiano
Magyar
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português
Română
Slovenčina
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български език
Русский
Српски
Українська мова
עִבְרִית
العربية
فارسی
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
ಕನ್ನಡ
ภาษาไทย
한국어
日本語
简体中文
繁體中文




 








Have an account?  Log in


   

Have an account?










Remember me

·
Forgot password?











New to Twitter?
Sign up
                











































      JulesMusing



@MusingJules












Tweets
Tweets, current page.
10.2K
            



Following
Following
411



Followers
Followers
640



Likes
Likes
3,030

 
 
More 







Likes






Unmute @MusingJules

Mute @MusingJules



Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  






















JulesMusing



@MusingJules


Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.



            Beautiful North Wales

      








Joined March 2010












                
                148 Photos and videos
            

            Photos and videos
          



















Tweets


Tweets
Tweets, current page.



                  Tweets & replies
                



                  Media
                





You blocked @MusingJules
Are you sure you want to view these Tweets? Viewing Tweets won't unblock @MusingJules
Yes, view profile






Close




            
            JulesMusing followed
        





















Pinned Tweet







JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

12 May 2016






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Thankfully for every John Beggs QC there's a Prof Phil Scraton #JFT96 #Hillsborough #DeepCut





0 replies




3 retweets




9 likes








Reply










Retweet


3




Retweeted


3








Like


9





Liked


9










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Michael

What a sad, sad time we live in.https://twitter.com/therightarticle/status/889540378155724800 …

JulesMusing added,








Michael @therightarticle

Why I’m leaving UK academia l Michael Edwards
http://michael-edwards.org/wp/?p=1076 









1 reply




1 retweet




1 like








Reply


1







Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Vince Cable

Vince, mate.https://twitter.com/vincecable/status/889198640652333056 …

JulesMusing added,








Vince CableVerified account @vincecable

#Labour has backtracked on #StudentDebt . Yet #LibDems still attacked for breaking pledge in 2010. .@nick_clegg apologised. Your turn Jeremy









0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 23






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Robert Harris

Love that our actual PM doesn't even get a look in https://twitter.com/robert___harris/status/888772638985859072 …

JulesMusing added,








Robert Harris @Robert___Harris

Their preferred UK restore settings year:
Corbyn 1972
Farage 1940
Fox 1913
Rees-Mogg 1588
Duncan Smith 1065
Cash 56 BC









0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 22






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Scott Nelson

I think we can all agree that's not why he did it https://twitter.com/socialistvoice/status/888809108022886400 …

JulesMusing added,








Scott Nelson @SocialistVoice

Boyfriend attacks partner in drunken rage before telling her "That's what you get for voting Labour" http://www.mirror.co.uk/news/uk-news/boyfriend-attacks-partner-drunken-rage-10852285 …









0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







bpas‏ @bpas1968

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







.@BootsUK have now announced that they will lower the price of emergency contraception. Thank you to everyone who has lobbied. #JustSayNonpic.twitter.com/KGzMqCXcPZ














stellacreasy,
    Jess Phillips,
    Norman Lamb and
    6 others









Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








stellacreasy @stellacreasy



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Jess Phillips @jessphillips



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Norman Lamb @normanlamb



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Ann Furedi @AnnFuredi



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Diana Johnson @DianaJohnsonMP



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Caroline Flint @CarolineFlintMP



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Emily Thornberry @EmilyThornberry



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








WomensEqualityUK @WEP_UK



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            











Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Jo Stevens @JoStevensLabour



                Unapologetic Boogie Bouncer, dog owner, feminist, atheist, snooker and tennis fan. Enjoys theatre and comedy. Has opinions (own) and swears.
            












65 replies




829 retweets




1,939 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Musa Okwonga‏Verified account @Okwonga

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







If BootsUK get boycotted they fully deserve it. What a gross, sexist reason for keeping high prices.
#justsaynonhttps://www.theguardian.com/business/2017/jul/20/boots-faces-boycott-over-refusal-to-lower-cost-of-morning-after-pill?CMP=share_btn_tw …









17 replies




100 retweets




136 likes








Reply


17







Retweet


100




Retweeted


100








Like


136





Liked


136










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Richard K Herring‏ @Herring1967

Jul 19






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







At least Doctor Who being a woman means the BBC have saved some money, right?





108 replies




2,670 retweets




7,090 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 18






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Jeremy Corbyn

Including someone from the Hillsborough Independent Panel wouldn't be a bad shout either.https://twitter.com/jeremycorbyn/status/887228196911013888 …

JulesMusing added,








Jeremy CorbynVerified account @jeremycorbyn

A diverse Grenfell Tower Inquiry team would help ensure residents are represented and feel confident in the process http://www.independent.co.uk/news/uk/politics/grenfell-fire-inquiry-panel-judge-jeremy-corbyn-theresa-may-ethnic-minority-a7845281.html …









0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 15






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







A stopped watch may well be right twice a day, but I still have absolutely NO interest in anything Tony Blair has to say.





1 reply




1 retweet




1 like








Reply


1







Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







World Snooker‏Verified account @WorldSnooker1

Jul 13






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







What a prize! 

RT for your chance to WIN a pair of #VIP  to the final of the European Masters in #Belgium!  http://bit.ly/2thtbRH pic.twitter.com/uLvZGNjHox
















66 replies




672 retweets




182 likes








Reply


66







Retweet


672




Retweeted


672








Like


182





Liked


182










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 14






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Jo Maugham QC

Then I presume murder charges must be brought https://twitter.com/jolyonmaugham/status/885721655384973312 …

JulesMusing added,








Jo Maugham QCVerified account @JolyonMaugham

Just when you think this story can't get any uglier... it does.
https://www.theguardian.com/uk-news/2017/jul/13/grenfell-tower-building-control-warned-about-refit-insulation-plan?CMP=Share_AndroidApp_Tweet …









0 replies




0 retweets




1 like








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







I  ❤80s‏ @IL0VEthe80s

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Retweet if you know who this lot are...pic.twitter.com/maGXGAq64t
















311 replies




1,452 retweets




1,282 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Dick King-Smith HQ‏ @DickKingSmith

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







We have six brand-new @PuffinBooks editions of animal classics to give away! RT/FL & reply with a funny pic of an animal you know to enter!pic.twitter.com/1CQRqFXwAv
















55 replies




102 retweets




107 likes








Reply


55







Retweet


102




Retweeted


102








Like


107





Liked


107










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 12






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted the harlequin pub

Sounds awful but why an open letter now?https://twitter.com/harlequinpub/status/884819754158051328 …

JulesMusing added,








the harlequin pub @harlequinpub

hi @ShefHallamLab - we've published an open letter to you from the woman who got hit in the face by your bouncers https://theharlequinpub.wordpress.com/2017/07/11/an-open-letter-to-jared-omara/ …









1 reply




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply


1







Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Asia‏ @AsiaChloeBrown

Jul 10






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Always remember that sperm is blind and weak, and does not seek the egg. Sperm is trapped and crushed by the egg.





55 replies




2,466 retweets




4,747 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Dear Freshers‏ @Dear_Freshers

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







"In your personal statement, you need to write about what you can offer the University" Oh I'm sorry is £27,000 not enough?





1 reply




30 retweets




108 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


30




Retweeted


30








Like


108





Liked


108










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Another Angry Woman‏ @stavvers

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







50 Shades of Grey is the literary and cinematic equivalent of ramming a few silica gel sachets up your quim.





13 replies




32 retweets




150 likes








Reply


13







Retweet


32




Retweeted


32








Like


150





Liked


150










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







NHS Million‏ @NHSMillion

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Would you be prepared to pay a higher rate of tax to provide additional funds for the NHS?

Please RT to increase the sample size #Hospital









159 replies




1,276 retweets




349 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













JulesMusing‏ @MusingJules

Jul 11






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






JulesMusing Retweeted Sky News

Alleged my arse, and oh dear God the comments https://twitter.com/skynews/status/884429774466105344 …

JulesMusing added,











2:54






Sky NewsVerified account @SkyNews

Conservative Party is investigating MP's alleged use of 'N' word in #Brexit conversation pic.twitter.com/GxQqqvOY6I









0 replies




0 retweets




1 like








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










JulesMusing Retweeted
            







Political Polls  📊‏ @PoliticsPollsGE

Jul 9






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Please retweet before voting.

This is a belief, not preference.

Do you believe there will be another general election this year? 









17 replies




683 retweets




78 likes








Reply


17







Retweet


683




Retweeted


683








Like


78





Liked


78










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo












          @MusingJules hasn't Tweeted yet.
      
Back to top ↑












Loading seems to be taking a while.

      Twitter may be over capacity or experiencing a momentary hiccup. Try again or visit Twitter Status for more information.
    

















      New to Twitter?
    


    Sign up now to get your own personalized timeline!
  

Sign up




You may also like
    ·
    Refresh








false












© 2017 Twitter
About
Help Center
Terms
Privacy policy
Cookies
Ads info




















Close




            
            Choose a trend location
          






















Dismiss











Close







            Previous
          







            Next
          













Close



Go to a person's profile












Searches you follow






    Follow
  

    Following
  

    Unfollow
  






Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @


























Close



Promote this Tweet

















Close



Block






Cancel
Block












Add a location to your Tweets

        When you tweet with a location, Twitter stores that location. 
        You can switch location on/off before each Tweet and always have the option to delete your location history.
        Learn more


Turn location on
Not now


























Close



Share Location















Results from 



Send









Close



Your lists













Close



Create a new list




List name




Description

Under 100 characters, optional



Privacy



Public · Anyone can follow this list
      


Private · Only you can access this list
      




Save list











Close
























Close



Copy link to Tweet




Here's the URL for this Tweet. Copy it to easily share with friends.












Close



Embed this Tweet
Embed this Video



Add this Tweet to your website by copying the code below. Learn more
Add this video to your website by copying the code below. Learn more




Hmm, there was a problem reaching the server. Try again?






            Include parent Tweet
          




            Include media
          




By embedding Twitter content in your website or app, you are agreeing to the Twitter Developer Agreement and Developer Policy.
Preview












Close



Why you're seeing this ad
















Close



Log in to Twitter
















Remember me

·
Forgot password?












        Don't have an account? Sign up »









Close



Sign up for Twitter





Not on Twitter? Sign up, tune into the things you care about, and get updates as they happen.


Sign up




        Have an account? Log in »









Close



Two-way (sending and receiving) short codes:





Country
Code
For customers of




United States
40404
(any)


Canada
21212
(any)


United Kingdom
86444
Vodafone, Orange, 3, O2


Brazil
40404
Nextel, TIM


Haiti
40404
Digicel, Voila


Ireland
51210
Vodafone, O2


India
53000
Bharti Airtel, Videocon, Reliance


Indonesia
89887
AXIS, 3, Telkomsel, Indosat, XL Axiata


Italy
4880804
Wind


3424486444
Vodafone





        » See SMS short codes for other countries













Close



Confirmation



















Close



 
















Close














            Skip all
          




    Welcome home!
  
This timeline is where you’ll spend most of your time, getting instant updates about what matters to you.




    Tweets not working for you?
  

    Hover over the profile pic and click the Following button to unfollow any account.
  




    Say a lot with a little
  

    When you see a Tweet you love, tap the heart — it lets  the person who wrote it know you shared the love.
  




    Spread the word
  

    The fastest way to share someone else’s Tweet with your followers is with a Retweet. Tap the icon to send it instantly.
  




    Join the conversation
  

    Add your thoughts about any Tweet with a Reply. Find a topic you’re passionate about, and jump right in.
  




    Learn the latest
  

    Get instant insight into what people are talking about now.
  




    Get more of what you love
  

    Follow more accounts to get instant updates about topics you care about.
  




    Find what's happening
  

    See the latest conversations about any topic instantly.
  




    Never miss a Moment
  

    Catch up instantly on the best stories happening as they unfold.
  



Back
Next














Next Tweet from user






















